Utah, session 2026, HB89.
Section 1. Section 77-37-2 is amended to read:1. General Provisions77-37-2. Definitions for chapter.As used in this chapter:(1)"Alleged sexual offender" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53-10-801.(2)"Child" means a personan individual who is younger than 18 years old, unless otherwise specified in statute.  The rights to information as extended in this chapter also apply to the parents, custodian, or legal guardians of children.(3)"Family member" means spouse, child, sibling, parent, grandparent, or legal guardian.(4)"HIV infection" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53-10-801.(5)"Law enforcement officer" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53-13-103.(5)(6)"Sexual assault kit" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53-10-902.(6)(7)(a)"Sexual offense" means any conduct described in:(i)Title 76, Chapter 5, Part 4, Sexual Offenses;(ii)Title 76, Chapter 5b, Sexual Exploitation Act; or(iii)Section 76-7-102, incest.(b)"Sexual offense" does not include conduct described in:(i)Section 76-5-417, enticing a minor;(ii)Section 76-5-420, lewdness involving a child; or(iii)Section 76-5b-206, failure to report child sexual abuse material by a computer technician.(7)(8)"Victim" means an individual, including a minor, against whom an offense has been allegedly committed.(8)(9)"Witness" means any personan individual who has been subpoenaed or is expected to be summoned to testify for the prosecution or who by reason of having relevant information is subject to call or likely to be called as a witness for the prosecution, whether any action or proceeding has commenced.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 77-37-201 is enacted to read:2. Additional Protections for Victims77-37-201. Definitions for part.As used in this part:(1)"Polygraph examination" means a procedure involving the use of an instrument or mechanical device that is:(a)designed to detect and record changes in the physiological characteristics of an individual, including the individual's pulse or breathing rate; and(b)used to determine whether an individual is being truthful.(2)"Polygraph examination" includes a lie detector test.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 77-37-202 is enacted to read:77-37-202. Prohibition on the use of a polygraph examination on a victim of a sexual offense.(1)A law enforcement officer, a prosecuting attorney, a court, or other government official may not:(a)ask or require a victim of a sexual offense to submit to a polygraph examination during the course of a criminal investigation or prosecution of a sexual offense; or(b)use a polygraph examination as a condition of proceeding with a criminal investigation or prosecution of a sexual offense.(2)The refusal of a victim of a sexual offense to submit to a polygraph examination may not prevent the investigation, charging, or prosecution of a sexual offense.

Section 4:
Section 4.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.